Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 30 Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act

9-30-1.
Scope.

The superior or family court upon petition, following such procedure as the court by general or special rules may prescribe, shall have power to declare rights, status, and other legal relations whether or not further relief is or could be claimed. No action or proceeding shall be open to objection on the ground that a declaratory judgment or decree is prayed for. The declaration may be either affirmative or negative in form and effect; and such declarations shall have the force and effect of a final judgment or decree.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 373, § 10.

9-30-2.
Power to construe.

Any person interested under a deed, will, written contract, or other writings constituting a contract, or whose rights, status, or other legal relations are affected by a statute, municipal ordinance, contract, or franchise, may have determined any question of construction or validity arising under the instrument, statute, ordinance, contract, or franchise and obtain a declaration of rights, status, or other legal relations thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 2.

9-30-3.
Construction of contracts.

A contract may be construed either before or after there has been a breach thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 3.

9-30-4.
Fiduciaries and other persons entitled to declaration of rights.

Any person interested as or through an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, or other fiduciary, creditor, devisee, legatee, heir, next of kin, or cestui que trust, in the administration of a trust, or of the estate of a decedent, an infant, person who is mentally incompetent or insolvent, may have a declaration of rights or legal relations in respect thereto:

To ascertain any class of creditors, devisees, legatees, heirs, next of kin, or others;

To direct the executors, administrators, or trustees to do or abstain from doing any particular act in their fiduciary capacity; or

To determine any question arising in the administration of the estate or trust, including questions of construction of wills and other writings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 9; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 9.

9-30-5.
General powers not limited by enumerations of special powers.

The enumerations in §§

9-30-2

,

9-30-3

, and

9-30-4

do not limit or restrict the exercise of the general powers conferred in §

9-30-1

, in any proceeding where declaratory relief is sought, in which a judgment or decree will terminate the controversy or remove an uncertainty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 5.

9-30-6.
Discretionary with court to render judgment.

The court may refuse to render or enter a declaratory judgment or decree where the judgment or decree, if rendered or entered, would not terminate the uncertainty or controversy giving rise to the proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 6.

Parties.

In a declaratory judgment action, a failure to join indispensable parties was fatal; unit owners who received the benefit of a condominium association’s assessment for deck repairs, but who bore the financial burden of the reallocated costs as set forth in the judgment, should have been joined in the lawsuit. The unit owners who were not joined could sue to avoid paying the reassessments ordered by the judgment, and this was antithetical to the purpose of declaratory judgment actions. Burns v. Moorland Farm Condo. Ass'n, 86 A.3d 354,

2014 R.I. LEXIS 27

(R.I. 2014).

9-30-7.
Review.

All orders, judgments, and decrees under this chapter may be reviewed as other orders, judgments, and decrees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 7; P.L. 1962, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 48.

9-30-8.
Supplemental relief.

Further relief based on a declaratory judgment or decree may be granted whenever necessary or proper. The application therefor shall be by petition to a court having jurisdiction to grant the relief. If the application is deemed sufficient, the court shall, on reasonable notice, require any adverse party whose rights have been adjudicated by the declaratory judgment or decree to show cause why further relief should not be granted forthwith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 8.

9-30-9.
Jury trial.

When a proceeding under this chapter involves the determination of an issue of fact, that issue shall be tried and determined in the same manner as issues of fact are tried and determined in other civil actions, and the right of trial by jury shall not be abridged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 9; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 48.

9-30-10.
Costs.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the court may make such award of costs as may seem equitable and just.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 10.

9-30-11.
Parties.

When declaratory relief is sought, all persons shall be made parties who have or claim any interest which would be affected by the declaration, and no declaration shall prejudice the rights of persons not parties to the proceeding. In any proceeding which involves the validity of a municipal ordinance or franchise, the municipality shall be made a party, and shall be entitled to be heard, and if the statute, ordinance, or franchise is alleged to be unconstitutional, the attorney general of the state shall also be served with a copy of the proceeding and be entitled to be heard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 11.

9-30-12.
Construction.

This chapter is declared to be remedial; its purpose is to settle and to afford relief from uncertainty and insecurity with respect to rights, status, and other legal relations; and is to be liberally construed and administered. The remedy provided by this chapter shall be cumulative and shall not exclude or prevent the exercise of any other right, remedy, or process heretofore allowed by law or by previous enactment of the legislature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 12.

9-30-13.
“Person” defined.

The word “person”, wherever used in this chapter, shall be construed to mean any person, partnership, joint stock company, unincorporated association, or society, or municipal or other corporation of any character whatsoever.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 13.

9-30-14.
Provisions severable.

The several sections and provisions of this chapter, except §§

9-30-1

and

9-30-2

, are hereby declared independent and severable, and the invalidity, if any, of any part or feature thereof shall not affect or render the remainder of the chapter invalid or inoperative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 14.

9-30-15.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it, and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of declaratory judgments and decrees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 15.

9-30-16.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 90, § 16.